Nebraska, session 109, LB1199.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1199 LB1199
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 7-203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
7-203 For purposes of the Legal Education for Public Service and
Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Act:
(1) Board means the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Board;
(2) Designated legal profession shortage area means a rural area
located within any county in Nebraska having a population of less than
seventy-five fifteen thousand inhabitants and not included within a
metropolitan statistical area as defined by the United States Department
of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, and determined by the board to be
underserved by available legal representation;
(3) Educational loans means loans received as an educational
benefit, scholarship, or stipend toward a juris doctorate degree and
either (a) made, insured, or guaranteed by a governmental unit or (b)
made under a program funded in whole or in part by a governmental unit or
nonprofit institution; and
(4) Public legal service means providing legal service to indigent
persons while employed by a tax-exempt charitable organization.
Sec. 2. Section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
59-1608.04 (1) The State Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by the
Attorney General. Except as otherwise provided by law, the fund shall
consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the Consumer Protection
Act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in
the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties,
whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or
settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or
controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General for the
-2-

LB1199 LB1199
2026 2026
benefit of the state or the general welfare of its citizens, but
excluding all funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits
accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments. The fund
may be expended for any allowable legal purposes as determined by the
Attorney General. Transfers from the State Settlement Cash Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature to the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund, the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund, the Financial Literacy Cash Fund, and the General Fund. To provide
necessary financial accountability and management oversight, revenue from
individual settlement agreements or other separate sources credited to
the State Settlement Cash Fund may be tracked and accounted for within
the state accounting system through the use of separate and distinct
funds, subfunds, or any other available accounting mechanism specifically
approved by the Accounting Administrator for use by the Department of
Justice. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund on July 1, 2013, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer eight hundred seventy-six
thousand nine hundred ninety-eight dollars from the State Settlement Cash
Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred
fifty-six thousand six hundred thirty-nine dollars from the State
-3-

LB1199 LB1199
2026 2026
Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal
Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance
Fund on or before April 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for
Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on or
before July 9, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer XXX dollars from the State
Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on the effective date of this
act, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.
Sec. 3. Original section 7-203, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-